Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 7 Transportation of Hazardous Materials

32-6-220 through 32-6-225.
[Repealed]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1985, p. 469, § 1, effective July 1, 1985, and by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1499, § 1, effective July 1, 1985.

Editor’s notes.

The provisions of this article were transferred to new Chapter 11 of Title 46 by Ga. L. 1985, p. 469 and by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1499.